Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.370

Misleading wrappers, containers of packaged commodities—Standards of fill required.

No commodity in package form shall be so wrapped, nor shall it be in a container so made, formed or filled as to mislead the purchaser as to the quantity of the contents of the package, and the contents of a container shall not fall below such reasonable standards of fill as may have been prescribed by the director for the commodity in question.

[ 1992 c 237 s 26; 1969 c 67 s 37.]